District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1274

Duties and responsibilities of General Manager

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 401, 41 DCR 5333

History

2001 Ed., §§ 10-1214 to 10-1220.
1981 Ed., §§ 9-604 to 9-610.

Prior Codifications

Repeal of Washington Convention Center Management Act: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1213.

Editor's Notes